Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 11

Highway Crossings

65-11-101. Construction and repair.

All persons, or corporations, owning or operating a railroad in this state, are required to make and furnish good and sufficient crossings on the public highways crossed by them, and keep such crossings in lawful repair at their own expense.

Subsection (a) shall not preclude construction, reconstruction, improvement or repair of crossings, through financial participation of the state or local government with a railroad authority established by law, when accomplished by contract with an independent contractor, or when such work will be performed by employees of a local government acting under direct supervision and total control of a railroad authority or its agent.

For liability purposes, when employees of a local government are working under the control of a railroad authority, such employees shall not be treated as employees of the local government, but instead shall be treated as employees of the railroad authority exercising control of the employees.

Notwithstanding subsections (a) or (b) to the contrary, after July 1, 2001, no public railroad grade crossing shall be constructed and no private crossing shall be converted to a public crossing without the entity desiring the crossing or the conversion having first:

Submitted the plans for the construction or conversion of the proposed crossing to the department of transportation; and

Obtained the department of transportation's approval of those plans. Prior to rendering its final decision, the department of transportation shall submit the plans it proposes to approve to the federal highway administration, the affected local government, and the involved railroad for review and comment. Any entity desiring the construction or conversion of a crossing shall be responsible for all costs associated with constructing or converting such crossing in compliance with the plans approved by the department of transportation. No public railroad grade crossing constructed after July 1, 2001, and no private crossing converted to a public crossing after July 1, 2001, shall be opened to vehicular traffic until such crossing is inspected by the department of transportation to assure that the crossing was constructed or converted in accordance with the approved plans.

The department of transportation shall promulgate standards pertaining to the construction or conversion of grade crossings pursuant to this subsection (c) including, but not limited to, appropriate warning devices. The department of transportation shall not approve any plans for construction or conversion of a railroad grade crossing that do not comply with the promulgated standards.

The department of transportation shall charge a fee for the review and approval of plans for construction or conversion of railroad crossings and the inspection of the completed crossings. Such fee shall be sufficient to offset the cost to the department of transportation of performing these services. Such fee shall be paid by the party seeking approval of the plans for the crossing.

The department of transportation shall promulgate rules and regulations pertaining to the approval of plans for construction or conversion of railroad grade crossings and the inspection of those crossings pursuant to this subsection (c).

Upon receipt of an application for approval of plans pursuant to this subsection (c), the department of transportation shall notify the affected railroad and the governmental body having jurisdiction over the proposed location.

If a crossing is constructed or converted in violation of this subsection (c), the affected railroad may remove the crossing and recover the cost of such removal from the party that constructed or converted the crossing.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the standards, rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this subsection (c) shall not be applied for any reason whatsoever to any railroad crossings established prior to July 1, 2001, except for the sole purpose of evaluating such railroad grade crossings for possible closure.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the standards, rules and regulations promulgated by the department of transportation pursuant to this subsection (c) shall take effect on or before March 1, 2002.

Acts 1889, ch. 119, § 1; Shan., § 1593; Code 1932, § 2657; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1101; Acts 1990, ch. 733, § 1; 2001, ch. 315, § 1; 2002, ch. 536, §§ 1, 2.

Cross-References. Costs of street improvements, §§ 7-32-111 — 7-32-114.

Crossing public roads, signals, § 65-12-108.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 471.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles and Other Vehicles, § 12; 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, §§ 1, 21, 41.

Law Reviews.

Railroad Tort Liability: A Symposium — Liability Aspects of Non-F. E. L. A. Litigation, 25 Tenn. L. Rev. 125 (1958).

Torts — Intervening Cause — Pedestrian Injured by Motorist on Narrow Railroad Bridge, 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 629 (1960).

65-11-102. Noncompliance with § 65-11-101 — Penalty.

A failure to observe and fully comply with § 65-11-101 shall subject the offender to a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Acts 1889, ch. 119, § 2; Shan., § 1594; mod. Code 1932, § 2658; Acts 1975, ch. 103, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1102.

65-11-103. Construction, maintenance and repair.

Every corporation or person operating a line of railroad within the state is required to maintain or construct to a plane with the rails of the railroad and to keep in repair every public road crossing of such railroad for a distance of ten feet (10') on each side of such railroad track and between the rails thereof. Where superelevated track or tracks or other physical conditions make strict compliance with this section impractical, the plane shall be constructed so as to provide the best vertical alignment under the circumstances with due regard to surface regularity. Nothing in this section is intended to change judicial interpretations of predecessor sections with respect to a railroad's obligation to keep in repair necessary crossing approaches beyond ten feet (10') on each side of such railroad tracks.

Acts 1899, ch. 356, § 1; Shan., § 1594a1; mod. Code 1932, § 2660; Acts 1975, ch. 103, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1103; Acts 1992, ch. 1005, § 1.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 21.

Law Reviews.

Look Out Ahead — Tennessee Grade Crossings, 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 865 (1955).

65-11-104. Noncompliance with § 65-11-103 — Misdemeanor.

The failure of any such person to comply with the requirements of § 65-11-103 is a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1899, ch. 356, § 2; Shan., § 1594a2; Code 1932, § 2661; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1104; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

65-11-105. Form of railroad crossing sign.

The commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee, after conducting such hearing as is deemed appropriate, is empowered and directed to determine a standard railroad crossing sign for the state.

Acts 1921, ch. 41, § 2; Shan. Supp., § 1593a1; mod. Code 1932, § 2659; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1105; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 25.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 44 provided:

“(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, upon the effective date of this section [July 1, 1995] all employees of the public service commission charged with the responsibility of regulating and enforcing the provisions of Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 3, and Chapter 5, Part 1 (repealed), and Chapters 11 and 12, and any other employees of the public service commission necessary to assist in such regulating and enforcing, shall be transferred to the department of transportation, created by Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-3-101.

“(b) All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, papers or other writings in the possession of the public service commission with respect to administering the provision of Title 65, assigned to the department of transportation by this act, shall be transferred to and remain in the custody of the department of transportation.

“(c) All leases, contracts and all contract rights and responsibilities in existence with the public service commission with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall be preserved and transferred to the department of transportation.

“(d) All assets, liabilities and obligations of the public service commission with respect to the duties transferred by this section shall become the assets, liabilities and obligations of the department of transportation.

“(e) Any revenues from rates, fares, charges, fines, and other moneys received pursuant to Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 65, Chapter 12, shall be allocated to the department of transportation as approved by the transition team pursuant to Section 48 to implement the provisions of this act.

“(f) The commissioner of transportation shall promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to Title 4, Chapter 5, to effectuate the purposes of this act.”

Cross-References. Automatic signals, § 65-11-113.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 43.

65-11-106. Liability for blocking street crossing.

No member of a railroad train crew shall be held personally guilty of violating a municipal ordinance regulating the blocking of street crossings by trains or cars, on proof that such action was necessary to comply with the orders or instructions of the crew member's employer or its officers; provided, that nothing in this section shall relieve the employer or railway from any responsibility placed upon it by the ordinance.

Acts 1949, ch. 159, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 266.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1106.

Collateral References.

Contributory negligence of child injured while climbing over or through railroad train blocking crossing. 11 A.L.R.3d 1168.

Liability of railroad for damage other than those incident to bodily injury for blocking street or highway crossing. 71 A.L.R. 917.

65-11-107. Elimination of grade crossings over public highways.

The department of transportation through its commissioner or the commissioner's designee has the power to eliminate grade crossings of any railroad or interurban railway track on any of the main traveled roads designated by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee as included in the general highway plan of the state, whenever, in the discretion of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, the elimination of any such grade crossing is necessary for the protection of persons traveling on any such highway or any such railroad.

Acts 1921, ch. 132, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1582a2; mod. Code 1932, § 2638; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1107.

Law Reviews.

Torts — Intervening Cause — Pedestrian Injured by Motorist on Narrow Railroad Bridge, 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 629 (1960).

65-11-108. Location and character of substituted crossing.

When any such grade crossing is ordered to be eliminated, the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee shall determine the location of the crossing to be substituted and the grade thereof, and whether it shall pass over or under the railroad tracks; provided, that on appeal from any such order by the railroad company affected to the chancery court in the judicial district in which the new grade crossing would be located, such chancery court shall have the power to make any change in the order appealed from with regard to the location and grade of the crossing to be constructed which may appear to the court to be necessary to adequately protect the safety of passenger and freight traffic on the railroad; and provided, further, that the appeal must be made within thirty (30) days of the date the order appealed from is certified to the railroad company affected.

Acts 1921, ch. 132, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1582a3; mod. Code 1932, § 2639; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed), § 65-1108; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 26.

65-11-109. Compliance with order to eliminate grade crossing.

When any such grade crossing shall be ordered to be eliminated as provided, it shall be the duty of the railroad company owning or operating the track at such crossing to comply with the order of the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee within the time specified in such order by preparing and submitting to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee for approval detailed plans and specifications and estimates of cost for the construction of such underpass or overpass and by the construction of the underpass or overpass in accordance with the plans and specifications so approved, including the necessary approaches thereto; provided, that:

Any such railroad company may request the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee for an extension of time within which to begin and complete the actual construction of the underpass or overpass required by such order of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee. If the railroad company is dissatisfied with the commissioner's or the commissioner's designee's response to the request for an extension of time, such railroad company may file an appeal to the chancery court in the judicial district in which the grade crossing in question is located; provided that the appeal must be made within thirty (30) days of the date of the adverse response;

The detailed plans and specifications and estimates of cost for any such underpass or overpass ordered by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee may be prepared in the discretion of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee by the department of transportation's own engineers, or by engineers employed for the purpose, in which event such plans and specifications and estimates of cost shall be subject to the approval of the railroad company affected;

If any such railroad company shall, in obedience to the direction of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee make surveys and prepare estimates and plans, then the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall within a reasonable time, not exceeding six (6) months, reimburse such railroad or railway for one half (½) of the expense and cost of such work; and if, after the making and preparation of any such surveys, plans, and estimates of cost by any railroad company under the orders of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, or any part thereof, the order for the elimination of the grade crossing be revoked by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, and the elimination of such crossing abandoned, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall, within a reasonable time, not exceeding six (6) months from the date of the revocation, reimburse the railroad or railway company for all the actual expense and cost of such work incurred by the company, upon a presentation of an itemized and sworn statement of the expense and cost, the amount thereof to be included as a part of the cost of the highway of which such crossing is a part;

Before any railroad company shall be obligated or required to commence and prosecute the actual and physical work of separating any such grade crossing, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall have available sufficient funds with which to reimburse the railroad company for that part of the expenses of the separation which is to be paid out of the public funds under this chapter; and the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall make to the railroad company, prosecuting such work, monthly payments in an amount which shall equal the proportion of the cost and expense which the public is required to pay under this chapter of all that part of the work, including both labor and materials, completed at the date of any monthly payment; and

When any grade crossing covered by §§ 65-11-107 and 65-11-108 shall have been ordered to be eliminated, as provided, it shall be the duty of the railroad company upon which such order of the state department of transportation may have been served, in accordance with this chapter, at once to comply with such order, or avail itself of the right of an appeal, as set forth in subdivision (1), within sixty (60) days from the date of the service of the order, and in the event any such railroad company should fail to comply with such order directing the elimination of such grade crossing, or to appeal within sixty (60) days, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall have the authority to proceed immediately with the construction of such grade crossing separation, and upon the completion of same to assess one half (½) of the cost of preparation of plans and estimates and one half (½) of the cost of the work of construction against the railroad company affected thereby, and all such costs as are assessed in this manner against such railroad company shall be a lien upon the physical properties of such railroad company, which lien shall be prior to any lien then existing against such physical properties, and the amount of such cost may be recovered against such railroad company by a suit brought on behalf of the state by the attorney general and reporter, and the enforcement, in the name of the state, of the lien.

Acts 1921, ch. 132, § 2; 1923, ch. 35, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1582a4; mod. Code 1932, § 2640; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1109; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 27.

Cross-References. Judgments for timbers, work, or damages to person or property, priority over other liens, § 65-10-112.

Liens of contractors, subcontractors, laborers and materialmen, priority, § 65-10-206.

Collateral References.

Constitutional power to compel railroad company to pay or contribute to expense of relocating or reconstructing highway crossing. 55 A.L.R. 660, 62 A.L.R. 815, 109 A.L.R. 768.

65-11-110. Apportionment of work in constructing underpass or overpass.

The commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee may, by agreement or contract with any railroad company, apportion the work to be done in the construction of any such underpass or overpass between the railroad company and contractors acting under the control and supervision of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, and contracts for the construction of the portion of such underpass or overpass assumed under such contract or agreement by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall be made in the manner and under the same conditions as contracts are made by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee for the construction of other portions of the state highway system as provided by law; provided, that when the commissioner or any of the department of transportation's employees or contractors, or any person acting under the orders of the commissioner or the commissioner's contractors, shall go or be upon the right-of-way of any railroad company, they shall be subject to any reasonable rules and regulations of such railroad company made for the protection of its traffic employees and passengers.

Acts 1921, ch. 132, § 3; Shan. Supp., § 1582a5; mod. Code 1932, § 2641; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1110.

65-11-111. Apportionment of cost of eliminating grade crossing.

Each railroad company owning or operating the track or tracks at any grade crossing ordered or agreed to be eliminated under this chapter shall bear fifty percent (50%) of the total cost of the elimination of any such grade crossing, the total cost to include the cost of the construction of the underpass or overpass substituted for the grade crossing, of the approaches thereto, of the surveys and preparations of the plans and estimates of cost for such underpass or overpass crossing ordered by the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee, and of any revision of the grade and layout of the railroad tracks directly made necessary by such grade separation, but shall not include the cost of metal surfacing or road pavement required in accomplishing the elimination of any grade crossing; provided, that any disagreement between the commissioner or the commissioner's designee and the railroad company affected with regard to the extent or cost of any such revision of the grade and layout of the railroad tracks directly made necessary by any grade separation, shall be resolved by the commissioner, and the commissioner's decision shall be final. The remaining fifty percent (50%) of the total cost shall be borne out of the public funds as a part of the cost of the highway of which the crossing is a part; provided, that a detailed statement of the expense of all that part of the construction of such underpass or overpass crossing, including the preparation of the detailed plans and specifications, etc., which is conducted by the railroad company, shall be submitted to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, duly sworn to by some official of the railroad company, having knowledge of the facts; and provided, further, that this provision for the division of cost between the public and the railroad company shall apply only to crossings already in existence or hereafter made, or proposed over railroad tracks in existence at the date of the order for elimination thereof, and shall not apply to any crossing of any highway by any railroad track not in existence at the date of the designation of such highway as a part of the state highway system by the department of transportation.

Acts 1921, ch. 132, § 4; 1925, ch. 88, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1582a6; mod. Code 1932, § 2642; impl. am. Acts 1955, ch. 69, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1111; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 28.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Railroads, § 21.

65-11-112. Maintenance of underpass or overpass.

When any underpass or overpass crossing is constructed on any state highway, under this chapter, it shall be maintained as follows:

The railroad company owning or operating the track at any such crossing shall maintain in good and safe repair at its sole expense all that part of any underpass or overpass and the approaches thereto on its rights-of-way, and also that part of any overpass structure or the approach thereto not supported by a fill, whether on its right-of-way or not, except the surface of the highway; provided, that the flooring of any overpass which supports the surface of the highway or which may constitute the surface of the highway shall be considered as a part of the structure to be maintained by and at the expense of the railroad company; and

The commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee shall maintain in good and safe repair out of the public funds, any fill, approach to any such crossing not on the right-of-way of the railroad company, and also the entire surface of the highway at all points.

Acts 1921, ch. 132, § 5; Shan. Supp., § 1582a7; Code 1932, § 2643; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1112.

65-11-113. Automatic warning or protective devices.

Within six (6) months after the occurrence of a fatality resulting from a collision between any railroad engine or train and a vehicle or pedestrian at any unmarked railroad grade crossing, where there are regularly scheduled trains, one hundred (100) or more vehicles cross daily and it is also a regular school bus crossing, and/or upon the order of the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee, the railroad company responsible for maintaining the track and right-of-way at such grade crossing shall install or cause to be installed a railroad crossing marker with automatic flashing signal lights and a bell on either side of the tracks along such street, road or highway crossing such tracks, in such a manner that approaching motorists, riders or pedestrians may be warned of the hazard and alerted to watch for an oncoming train or engine.

A railroad company shall have six (6) months from the time of an order of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee in which to install or cause to be installed the automatic warning or protective devices required. If such devices are not installed and operative at the end of this period of time, and the commissioner has not granted an extension based on hardship or act of God, the speed of trains operating within one (1) mile in each direction of such crossing shall be restricted to not more than twenty-five (25) miles per hour. This restriction shall continue until the devices are fully operational.

The cost of installing such signal devices shall be borne equally by the railroad company, the state of Tennessee, and the county, or the municipality, if such signal devices are installed within the corporate limits or the metropolitan government, where applicable.

Payment of the state's share shall be made as reimbursement of the railroad company of one third (1/3) of the cost of such installation, by warrant of the commissioner of finance and administration upon the state treasury, after inspection of the site and certification by the commissioner of transportation or the commissioner's designee that such signal devices have been installed in compliance with this section; provided, that the railroad company has first submitted to the commissioner of finance and administration a sworn statement of the total costs incurred by the railroad company in installing such signal devices.

Payment of the municipality's or county's or metropolitan government's share of the costs shall similarly be made in accordance with the fiscal procedures of such municipality, county, or metropolitan government after receipt of a sworn statement from the railroad company of the total cost of the installations and verification of such installation by the appropriate municipal, county or metropolitan government official.

If any county, municipal or metropolitan government fails or refuses to reimburse the railroad company as provided in this section, the commissioner of finance and administration shall cause the necessary amount of money to be withheld from such county, municipal or metropolitan government any amount due such county, municipal or metropolitan government from the proceeds of the state gasoline tax and reimburse the railroad company using such funds otherwise due the county, municipal or metropolitan government. The Tennessee department of transportation shall be prohibited from adopting any rules or regulations which will circumvent the purposes of this section by setting incompatible criteria for determining priorities for the installation of railroad crossing signals.

In the event federal funds are available to defray the cost of such installation in whole or in part, the federal rules then applicable shall determine the allocation of the costs of such installation.

Any railroad company failing to comply with the requirements of subsections (a)-(d) is subject to a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each day of continued violation.

The department of transportation is authorized to construct protective or warning devices at or in the vicinity of any railroad crossing of a public highway owned by a county or incorporated city or town, based upon the showing of need resulting from a multidisciplinary study, whenever federal funds are available for such construction. The department of transportation is further authorized to supply a maximum of one percent (1%) of the funds required for such construction provided the county or incorporated city or town in which the construction will be performed complies with the necessary conditions for receipt of the balance of federal matching funds for such construction.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department of transportation shall construct automatic warning devices at the railroad crossing at Tipton Station Road in southern Knox County.

Acts 1974, ch. 646, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 236, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 65-1113, 65-1115; Acts 1983, ch. 184, § 1; T.C.A., § 65-11-114; Acts 1996, ch. 912, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

65-11-114. [Transferred.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 65-11-114, concerning noncompliance with § 65-11-113(a)-(d), was transferred to § 65-11-113 in 1991.

65-11-115. Installation of warning strips authorized.

The department of transportation may install warning strips on both approaches of any highway crossing on the system of state highways not protected by automatic warning or protective devices, unless the surface of such approaches is gravel or chip and seal paving.

Acts 1990, ch. 997, § 1.

65-11-116. Competitive bidding — Negotiating labor costs.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, all contracts to perform maintenance or improvements on railroads which are funded, in whole or in part, with funds administered by the Tennessee department of transportation shall be awarded pursuant to competitive bidding requirements as approved by the department of transportation. This section shall not apply to rail crossings to be signalized following a fatality pursuant to § 65-11-113.

In the alternative to subsection (a), all contracts to perform maintenance or improvements on railroads with collective bargaining labor agreements shall allow negotiated labor costs for the labor portion of the contracts. It is the intent of the general assembly that only labor and associated costs shall be reimbursable pursuant to this provision. All other costs associated with the contract, including, but not limited to, materials and equipment, shall be subject to competitive bidding requirements as approved by the department of transportation. All costs associated with such contracts shall be subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury to ensure that the contracts are performed on a break-even basis and that the state does not reimburse profits to the railroad company involved.

Acts 1999, ch. 450, § 2.